Washington statutes.
RCW 4.72.090

Judgment upon denial of application.

In all cases in which an application under this chapter to vacate or modify a judgment or order for the recovery of money is denied, if proceedings on the judgment or order shall have been suspended, judgment shall be rendered against the plaintiff [applicant] for the amount of the former judgment or order, interest and costs, together with damages at the discretion of the court, not exceeding ten percent on the amount of the judgment or order.

[ 1891 c 27 s 5; Code 1881 s 444; 1877 p 97 s 446; 1875 p 22 s 9; RRS s 473.]